Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,240
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Pure Food Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 81-2,241 to 81-2,254 shall be used. In addition, the definitions found in the code and practice adopted by reference in sections 81-2,257.01 and 81-2,259 shall be used.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 548, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 81-216.02;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 9;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 56;

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 474, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 1045, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 131, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB798, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB134, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB562, § 25;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 29;

Laws 2025, LB246, § 2.